Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Article 5. Select Federal Natural Resource Management Committee

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 61, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved Februrary 15, 2013.

§ 28-11-501.
Appointment of members; powers and duties.

Not later than March 15 following each general election, a select federal natural resource management committee shall be appointed subject to the following:

The president of the senate shall appoint three (3) members of the senate apportioned as nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of the senate, provided not more than five (5) of the members of the select committee shall be from the same political party. Select committee membership shall include:

One (1) member of the senate agriculture, state and public lands and water resources committee;

One (1) member appointed at-large; and

One (1) member of the senate minerals, business and economic development committee.

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint three (3) members of the house apportioned as nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of the house, provided not more than five (5) of the members of the select committee shall be from the same political party. Select committee membership shall include:

One (1) member of the house agriculture, state and public lands and water resources committee;

One (1) member appointed at-large; and

One (1) member of the house minerals, business and economic development committee.

The select committee shall:

Select from among its members one (1) senator and one (1) member of the house to serve as co-chairmen;

Meet as necessary to review existing or proposed federal policies or action which may impact the management, development or use of the state’s natural resources;

Consider issues related to public lands. In considering the topic, the select committee:

Shall determine the potential structure of ownership of public lands within the state including consideration of the state owning the surface rights, owning the subsurface rights, managing either the surface or subsurface, or both, or other ownership and management options as determined by the committee;

Shall determine criteria for management of public lands including consideration of rights currently existing under federal law;

Shall consider methods for the federal government to divest public lands held within the state including consideration of legal action and congressional action;

May secure consulting services, if necessary, to provide technical assistance in compiling information related to public lands within the state or other issues related to the transfer of public lands.

Develop and introduce legislation as necessary related to the acquisition or management of public lands and legislative responses to federal policies and actions necessary to protect the interests of the state of Wyoming.

As used in this section, “public lands” means any surface or subsurface lands within the boundaries of the state, title to which is held by the federal government. “Public lands” shall not include any land within the boundaries of a designated national park, designated national monument or wilderness area designated under the national wilderness preservation system.

History.

2013 ch. 61, § 1, effective February 15, 2013; 2014 ch. 122, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(i)(B) and (a)(ii)B), substituted “appointed at-large” for “of the senate appropriations committee”; in the first sentence of (b)(iii), substituted “Consider issues related to public lands,” for “Develop and introduce legislative responses to federal policies and actions necessary to protect the interests of the state of Wyoming,” added the second sentence of the introductory language of (b)(iii); added (b)(iii)(A) through (b)(iii)(D); added (b)(iv); added (c).

Laws 2014, ch. 122, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2013, ch. 61, § 2, directs:
“There is appropriated sixteen thousand dollars ($16,000.00) from
the general fund to the legislative service office. This appropriation
shall only be expended to provide salary, travel and per diem to members
of the select natural resource management committee for meetings held
from the effective date of this act through June 30, 2014. Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated
funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by
law on June 30, 2014.”